Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-2,116
Diversion of service; provisions applicable.

(1) In addition to any other criminal procedure and penalty provided by law, any person who unlawfully diverts or interferes with telecommunications service may be subject to sections 28-515.01, 28-515.02, 28-519, 28-1311, and 76-2325.01.

(2) In addition to any other civil procedure and remedy provided by law, any person who unlawfully diverts telecommunications service may be subject to actions authorized in sections 25-21,275 to 25-21,278.

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 178.